Missouri, session 2026, HB1947.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 650, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 650.930, to read as follows:
650.930. 1. There is hereby established within the department of public safety
the "Missouri Gaming Bureau". The Missouri gaming commission and the Missouri
lottery commission may contract with the Missouri gaming bureau for assistance in
criminal and regulatory investigations involving individuals, companies, and suppliers
who are applying for licensure or who are conducting any activities under sections
313.800 to 313.850 or operations relating to video lottery games.
2. The director of the gaming bureau shall be a uniformed member of the
Missouri state highway patrol who shall be appointed by the superintendent of the state
highway patrol. The director shall be responsible for the administrative operations of
the gaming bureau and shall perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned
to the director by the department of public safety. Members of the state highway patrol,
pursuant to a memorandum of understanding with the state highway patrol, may
provide services to the gaming bureau. The director may employ additional members of
the state highway patrol to serve in the gaming bureau, provided that such persons are
licensed peace officers under chapter 590 and have a minimum of six hundred hours of
law enforcement training.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1947 2
3. Members of the gaming bureau shall have full power and authority as are now
or hereafter vested by law in peace officers when working with the bureau, which shall
include the power to enforce the rules of the gaming commission with respect to the
gaming and lottery industry and the power to investigate violations occurring on the
gaming floors and premises of casinos licensed under sections 313.800 to 313.850,
violations by licensees of the lottery commission, and violations of chapter 572.
4. Members of the gaming bureau shall be paid from funds designated as
administrative within the state lottery fund established under section 313.321 that were
generated from revenues received by the Missouri lottery commission from the sale of
Missouri lottery tickets and from license fees and reimbursements associated with the
regulation and operation of video lottery games in the state and from funds designated
as administrative within the gaming commission fund established under section 313.835
that were generated from revenues received by the Missouri gaming commission from
license fees and reimbursements associated with the regulation and operation of
excursion gambling boats in the state.
5. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔